Tennessee, session 114, HB0511.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Title 56, Chapter 7, Part 10, is amended by
adding the following as a new section:
A healthcare provider, healthcare group, practice, or clinic, healthcare facility, or
other entity contracted with one (1) or more health insurance entities for reimbursement
of submitted claims for the provision of health care or healthcare-related goods or
services, shall provide notice to each such health insurance entity as soon as practicable
if the healthcare provider, healthcare group, practice, or clinic, healthcare facility, or
other entity is the subject of a cyber-attack.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0511
001872
- 1 -